Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.020

Subject matter jurisdiction.

(1) Except to the extent jurisdiction is precluded by the uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act (chapter 26.27 RCW), the superior court of each county has jurisdiction over a guardianship for a minor domiciled or present in this state. The court has jurisdiction over a conservatorship or protective arrangement instead of conservatorship for a minor domiciled or having property in this state.

(2) The superior court of each county has jurisdiction over a guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter for an adult as provided in the uniform adult guardianship and protective proceedings jurisdiction act (chapter 11.90 RCW).

(3) After notice is given in a proceeding for a guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter and until termination of the proceeding, the court in which the petition is filed has:

(a) Exclusive jurisdiction to determine the need for the guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement;

(b) Exclusive jurisdiction to determine how property of the respondent must be managed, expended, or distributed to or for the use of the respondent, an individual who is dependent in fact on the respondent, or other claimant;

(c) Nonexclusive jurisdiction to determine the validity of a claim against the respondent or property of the respondent or a question of title concerning the property; and

(d) If a guardian or conservator is appointed, exclusive jurisdiction over issues related to administration of the guardianship or conservatorship.

(4) A court that appoints a guardian or conservator, or authorizes a protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter, has exclusive and continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until the court terminates the proceeding or the appointment or protective arrangement expires by its terms.

[ 2019 c 437 s 104.]